Illinois, session 104th, SB1453.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 15-202 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/15-202)7    Sec. 15-202. Optional deferred compensation plan. 8    (a) As soon as practicable after August 10, 2018 (the 9effective date of Public Act 100-769), the System shall offer 10a deferred compensation plan that is eligible under Section 11457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to 12participating employees of the System employed by employers 13described in Section 15-106 of this Code that qualify as 14eligible employers under Section 457(e)(1)(A) of the Internal 15Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. Such eligible employers 16shall adopt the plan with an effective date no later than 17September 1, 2021. Participating employees may voluntarily 18elect to make elective deferrals to the eligible deferred 19compensation plan. Eligible employers may make optional 20employer contributions to the plan on behalf of participating 21employees, which contributions may be maintained, increased, 22reduced, or eliminated at the discretion of the employer from 23plan year to plan year. The plan shall collect voluntary   SB1453- 2 -LRB104 08301 RPS 18352 b1employee and optional employer contributions into an account 2for each participant and shall offer investment options to the 3participant. The plan under this Section shall be operated in 4full compliance with any applicable State and federal laws, 5and the System shall utilize generally accepted practices in 6creating and maintaining the plan for the best interest of the 7participants. In administering the deferred compensation plan, 8the System shall require that the deferred compensation plan 9recordkeeper agree that, in performing services with respect 10to the deferred compensation plan, the recordkeeper: (i) will 11not use information received as a result of providing services 12with respect to the deferred compensation plan or the 13participants in the deferred compensation plan to solicit the 14participants in the deferred compensation plan for the purpose 15of cross-selling nonplan products and services, unless in 16response to a request by a participant in the deferred 17compensation plan or a request by the System; and (ii) will not 18promote, recommend, endorse, or solicit participants in the 19deferred compensation plan to purchase any financial products 20or services outside of the deferred compensation plan, except 21that links to parts of the recordkeeper's or the 22recordkeeper's affiliate's website that are generally 23available to the public, are about commercial products, and 24may be encountered by a participant in the regular course of 25navigating the recordkeeper's or the recordkeeper's 26affiliate's website will not constitute a violation of this   SB1453- 3 -LRB104 08301 RPS 18352 b1item (ii). The System may use funds from the employee and 2employer contributions to defray any and all costs of creating 3and maintaining the plan. The System shall produce an annual 4report on the participation in the plan and shall make the 5report public.6    (b) The System shall automatically enroll in the eligible 7deferred compensation plan any employee of an eligible 8employer who first becomes a participating employee of the 9System on or after July 1, 2023 under an eligible automatic 10contribution arrangement that is subject to Section 414(w) of 11the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the United 12States Department of Treasury regulations promulgated 13thereunder. An employee who is automatically enrolled under 14this subsection (b) shall have 3% of his or her compensation, 15as defined by the plan, for each pay period deferred on a 16pre-tax basis into his or her account, subject to any 17contribution limits applicable to the plan. The Board may 18increase the default percentage of compensation deferred under 19this subsection (b). 20    An employee shall have 30 days from the date on which the 21System provides the notice required under Section 414(w) of 22the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to elect to not 23participate in the eligible deferred compensation plan or to 24elect to increase or reduce the initial amount of elective 25deferrals made to the plan. In the absence of such affirmative 26election, the employee shall be automatically enrolled in the   SB1453- 4 -LRB104 08301 RPS 18352 b1plan on the first day of the calendar month, or as soon as 2administratively practicable thereafter, following the 30th 3day from the date on which the System provides the required 4notice. An employee who has been automatically enrolled in the 5plan under this subsection (b) may elect, within 90 days of 6enrollment, to withdraw from the plan and receive a refund of 7amounts deferred, adjusted by applicable earnings and fees. An 8employee making such an election shall forfeit all employer 9matching contributions, if any, made with respect to such 10refunded elective deferrals and such forfeited amounts shall 11be used to defray plan expenses. Any refunded elective 12deferrals shall be included in the employee's gross income for 13the taxable year in which the refund is issued. 14    (c) The System may provide for one or more automatic 15contribution arrangements, which shall comply with all 16applicable Internal Revenue Service rules and regulations, in 17conjunction with or in lieu of the eligible automatic 18contribution arrangement under subsection (b), for 19participating employees of eligible employers whose annual 20earnings are limited by application of subsection (b) of 21Section 15-111 of this Code. The amount of elective deferrals 22made for the employee each pay period under an automatic 23contribution arrangement shall equal the default percentage 24specified by resolution of the Board multiplied by the 25employee's compensation as defined by the plan, subject to any 26contribution limits applicable to the plan, and shall be made   SB1453- 5 -LRB104 08301 RPS 18352 b1on a pre-tax basis. An employee subject to this subsection (c) 2shall have 30 days from the date on which the System provides 3written notice to the employee to elect to not participate in 4the eligible deferred compensation plan or to elect to 5increase or reduce the amount of initial elective deferrals 6made to the plan. In the absence of such affirmative election, 7the employee shall be automatically enrolled in the plan 8beginning the first day of the calendar month, or as soon as 9administratively practicable thereafter, following the 30th 10day from the date on which the System provides the required 11notice.12    (d) The System may provide that the default percentage for 13any employee automatically enrolled in the eligible deferred 14compensation plan under subsection (b) or (c) be increased by 15a specified percentage each plan year after the plan year in 16which the employee is automatically enrolled in the plan. The 17amount of automatic annual increases in any plan year shall 18not exceed 1% of compensation as defined by the plan. 19    (e) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 20Act of the 102nd General Assembly are corrections of existing 21law and are intended to be retroactive to the effective date of 22Public Act 100-769, notwithstanding Section 1-103.1 of this 23Code. 24(Source: P.A. 102-540, eff. 8-20-21; 103-552, eff. 8-11-23.) 25    Section 10. The University Employees Custodial Accounts   SB1453- 6 -LRB104 08301 RPS 18352 b1Act is amended by changing Section 2 as follows: 2    (110 ILCS 95/2)  (from Ch. 144, par. 1702)3    Sec. 2. The governing board of any public institution of 4higher education has the power to establish a defined 5contribution plan to make payments to custodial accounts for 6investment in regulated investment company stock to provide 7retirement benefits as described in Section 403(b)(7) of the 8Internal Revenue Code for eligible employees of such 9institutions. Such payments shall be made with funds made 10available by deductions from or reductions in salary or wages 11of eligible employees who authorize in writing deductions or 12reductions for such purpose. Such stock shall be purchased 13only from persons authorized to sell such stock in this State.14    In administering the defined contribution plan, the 15governing board of any public institution of higher education 16shall require that the defined contribution plan recordkeeper 17agree that, in performing services with respect to the defined 18contribution plan, the recordkeeper: (i) will not use 19information received as a result of providing services with 20respect to the defined contribution plan or the participants 21in the defined contribution plan to solicit the participants 22in the defined contribution plan for the purpose of 23cross-selling nonplan products and services, unless in 24response to a request by a participant in the defined 25contribution plan or a request by the governing board of the   SB1453- 7 -LRB104 08301 RPS 18352 b1public institution of higher education or its authorized 2delegate; and (ii) will not promote, recommend, endorse, or 3solicit participants in the defined contribution plan to 4purchase any financial products or services outside of the 5defined contribution plan, except that links to parts of the 6recordkeeper's or the recordkeeper's affiliate's website that 7are generally available to the public, are about commercial 8products, and may be encountered by a participant in the 9regular course of navigating the recordkeeper's or the 10recordkeeper's affiliate's website will not constitute a 11violation of this item (ii). However, a public institution of 12higher education may allow promotion of limited services if 13the public institution of higher education receives no 14compensation from the recordkeeper for promoting or providing 15such services. Such limited services may include educational, 16counseling, debt reduction, student loan repayment or 17forgiveness, or other services intended to enhance retirement 18savings opportunities. Such limited services may not include 19credit cards, life insurance, or banking products, unless a 20request to provide those products is made by the governing 21board of the public institution of higher education or its 22authorized delegate. 23(Source: P.A. 103-552, eff. 8-11-23.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.